Nebraska, session 109, LB326.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 44-1523, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-1523 For purposes of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act:
(1) Customer means an individual who purchases, applies to purchase, or is
solicited to purchase an insurance product primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes;
(2) (1) Department means shall mean the Department of Insurance;
(3) (2) Director means shall mean the Director of Insurance;
(4) Health insurance lead generator means a person that utilizes a lead
generating device to (a) publicize the availability of what is, or what
purports to be, a health insurance product or service that the person is not
licensed to sell directly to a customer, (b) identify a customer who may want
to learn about a health insurance product, or (c) sell or transmit customer
information to an insurer or producer for follow-up contact and sales activity;
(5) (3) Insured means shall mean the party named on a policy or
certificate as the individual with legal rights to the benefits provided by
such policy or certificate;
(6) (4) Insurer means shall mean any person, reciprocal exchange,
interinsurer, Lloyds-type insurer or other similar group which includes an
incorporated and individual unincorporated underwriter underwriters, a
fraternal benefit society, or and other legal entity engaged in the business of
insurance, including an agent agents, a broker brokers, an insurance consultant
consultants, an adjuster adjusters, or a and third-party administrator
administrators. Insurer also includes a shall also mean health maintenance
organization organizations, a prepaid limited health service organization
organizations, and a dental, optometric, or and other similar health service
plan plans. For purposes of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act act, all
such insurers shall be deemed to be engaged in the business of insurance;
(7) Lead generating device means a communication directed to the public
that, regardless of form, content, or stated purpose, is intended to result in
the compilation or qualification of a list containing names and other personal
information to be used to solicit residents of this state for the purchase of
what is, or what purports to be, a health insurance product or service;
(8) (5) Person means a shall mean any natural or artificial entity,
including, but not limited to, an individual, a partnership, a limited
liability company, an association, a trust, or a corporation, including a
health insurance lead generator operating as a natural or artificial entity;
and
(9) (6) Policy or certificate means shall include any contract of
insurance, indemnity, suretyship, or annuity issued, proposed for issuance, or
intended for issuance by an any insurer; and .
(10) Recording means an audio reproduction of sales and verification of
calls, including virtual technology calls, in its entirety, used in the
marketing of insurance.
Sec. 2. Section 44-1524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1524 It shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance
for any insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person engaged in the
business of insurance to commit any act or practice defined in section 44-1525
if the act or practice (1) is committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard
of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act or any rule or regulation adopted
pursuant to the act or (2) is has been committed with such frequency as to
-1-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
indicate a general business practice to engage in that type of conduct.
Sec. 3. Section 44-1525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1525 Any of the following acts or practices, if committed in violation
of section 44-1524, shall be an unfair trade practice practices in the business
of insurance:
(1) Making, issuing, circulating, or causing to be made, issued, or
circulated an any estimate, illustration, circular, statement, sales
presentation, omission, or comparison which:
(a) Misrepresents the benefits, advantages, conditions, or terms of a any
policy;
(b) Misrepresents the dividends or share of the surplus to be received on
a any policy;
(c) Makes a any false or misleading statement relating statements as to
the dividends or share of surplus previously paid on a any policy;
(d) Misleads as to or misrepresents the financial condition of an any
insurer or the legal reserve system upon which a any life insurer operates;
(e) Uses a any name or title of a any policy or class of policies which
misrepresents the true nature thereof;
(f) Misrepresents for the purpose of inducing or tending to induce the
purchase, lapse, forfeiture, exchange, conversion, or surrender of a any
policy, including intentionally misquoting a any premium rate;
(g) Misrepresents for the purpose of effecting a pledge or assignment of
or effecting a loan against any policy; or
(h) Misrepresents a any policy as being shares of stock;
(2) Making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or placing before the
public, or causing, directly or indirectly, to be made, published,
disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in a newspaper,
magazine, electronic mail, Internet advertisement or posting, or other
publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, electronic
posting of any kind, or poster, or communication over a any radio or television
station, or via the Internet or other electronic means, or in any other way, an
advertisement, announcement, or statement containing an any assertion,
representation, or statement with respect to the business of insurance or with
respect to an any insurer in the conduct of the insurer's his or her insurance
business which is untrue, deceptive, or misleading;
(3) Making, publishing, disseminating, or circulating, directly or
indirectly, or aiding, abetting, or encouraging the making, publishing,
disseminating, or circulating of any oral or written statement or a any
pamphlet, circular, article, or other literature which is false or maliciously
critical of, or derogatory to, the financial condition of an any insurer and
which is calculated to injure such insurer;
(4) Entering into an any agreement to commit, or by a any concerted action
committing, an any act of boycott, coercion, or intimidation resulting in, or
tending to result in, unreasonable restraint of or monopoly in the business of
insurance;
(5)(a) Knowingly filing with a any supervisory or other public official,
or knowingly making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or delivering to a
any person, or placing before the public, or knowingly causing, directly or
indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, delivered to a any
person, or placed before the public, any false material statement of fact as to
the financial condition of an insurer; or
(b) Knowingly making a any false entry of a material fact in a any book,
report, or statement of an any insurer or knowingly omitting to make a true
entry of a any material fact pertaining to the business of such insurer in a
any book, report, or statement of such insurer;
(6) Issuing or delivering or permitting an agent agents, officer officers,
or employee employees to issue or deliver agency company stock or other capital
stock, or benefit certificates or shares in any common-law corporation, or
securities or a any special or advisory board contract contracts or other
contract contracts of any kind promising returns and profits as an inducement
to insurance;
(7)(a) Making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals
of the same class and equal expectation of life in the rates charged for a any
life insurance policy or annuity or in the dividends or other benefits payable
thereon or in any other of the terms and conditions of such policy or annuity;
(b) Making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals of
the same class involving essentially the same hazards in the amount of premium,
policy fees, or rates charged for a any sickness and accident insurance policy
or in the benefits payable thereunder, in any of the terms or conditions of
such policy, or in any other manner, except that this subdivision shall not
limit the negotiation of preferred provider policies and contracts under
sections 44-4101 to 44-4113;
(c) Making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals or
risks of the same class and of essentially the same hazards by refusing to
issue, refusing to renew, canceling, or limiting the amount of insurance
coverage on a property or casualty risk because of the geographic location of
the risk unless:
(i) The refusal, cancellation, or limitation is for a business purpose
which is not a pretext for unfair discrimination; or
(ii) The refusal, cancellation, or limitation is required by law, rule, or
regulation;
(d) Making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals or
-2-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
risks of the same class and of essentially the same hazards by refusing to
issue, refusing to renew, canceling, or limiting the amount of insurance
coverage on a residential property risk, or the personal property contained
therein, because of the age of the residential property unless:
(i) The refusal, cancellation, or limitation is for a business purpose
which is not a pretext for unfair discrimination; or
(ii) The refusal, cancellation, or limitation is required by law, rule, or
regulation;
(e) Refusing to insure, refusing to continue to insure, or limiting the
amount of coverage available to an individual solely because of the sex or
marital status of the individual. This subdivision shall not prohibit an
insurer from taking marital status into account for the purpose of defining an
individual individuals eligible for dependent benefits; or
(f) Terminating or modifying coverage or refusing to issue or refusing to
renew any property or casualty insurance policy solely because the applicant or
insured or an any employee of the applicant or insured is mentally or
physically impaired unless:
(i) The termination, modification, or refusal is for a business purpose
which is not a pretext for unfair discrimination; or
(ii) The termination, modification, or refusal is required by law, rule,
or regulation.
This subdivision (f) shall not apply to a any sickness and accident
insurance policy sold by a casualty insurer and shall not be interpreted to
modify any other provision of law relating to the termination, modification,
issuance, or renewal of any policy;
(8)(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided by law:
(i) Knowingly permitting or offering to make or making any life insurance
policy, annuity, or sickness and accident insurance policy, or agreement
relating as to any such policy or annuity, other than as plainly expressed in
the policy or annuity issued thereon, or paying, allowing, or giving, or
offering to pay, allow, or give, directly or indirectly, as inducement to such
policy or annuity, a any rebate of premiums payable on the policy or annuity,
or a any special favor or advantage in the dividends or other benefits thereon,
or any valuable consideration or inducement whatever not specified in the
policy or annuity; or
(ii) Giving, selling, purchasing, or offering to give, sell, or purchase
as inducement to such policy or annuity or in connection therewith any stocks,
bonds, or other securities of an any insurer or other corporation, association,
partnership, or limited liability company, or any dividends or profits accrued
thereon, or anything of value not specified in the policy or annuity.
(b) Nothing in subdivision (7) or (8)(a) of this section shall be
construed as including within the definition of discrimination or rebates any
of the following acts or practices:
(i) In the case of a any life insurance policy or annuity, paying bonuses
to policyholders or otherwise abating their premiums, in whole or in part, out
of surplus accumulated from nonparticipating insurance if such bonuses or
abatement of premiums are fair and equitable to policyholders and for the best
interests of the insurer and its policyholders;
(ii) In the case of life insurance policies issued on the industrial debit
plan, making allowance to policyholders who have continuously for a specified
period made premium payments directly to an office of the insurer in an amount
which fairly represents the saving in collection expenses; or
(iii) Readjustment of the rate of premium for a group insurance policy
based on the loss or expense thereunder, at the end of the first or any
subsequent policy year of insurance thereunder, which may be made retroactive
only for such policy year;
(9) Failing of an any insurer to maintain a complete record of all the
complaints received since the date of its last examination conducted pursuant
to the Insurers Examination Act. This record shall indicate the total number of
complaints, their classification by line of insurance, the nature of each
complaint, the disposition of each complaint, and the processing time for it
took to process each complaint. For purposes of this subdivision, complaint
means shall mean any written communication primarily expressing a grievance;
(10) Making a false or fraudulent statement statements or representation
representations on, or relative to, an application for a policy for the purpose
of obtaining a fee, commission, money, or other benefit from an any insurer,
agent, broker, or individual person;
(11) Failing of an any insurer, upon receipt of a written inquiry from the
department, to respond to such inquiry or request additional reasonable time to
respond within fifteen working days;
(12) Accepting applications for, or writing any policy of, insurance sold,
negotiated, or solicited by an insurance producer or business entity not
licensed or appointed as required by the Insurance Producers Licensing Act; and
(13) Failing of a health insurance lead generator to maintain its books,
records, documents, and other business records, including recordings, in such
an order that data regarding complaints and marketing are accessible and
retrievable for examination by the director. Data for at least the current
calendar year and the two preceding calendar years shall be maintained; and
(14) (13) Violating any provision of section 44-320, 44-348, 44-360,
44-361, 44-369, 44-393, 44-515 to 44-518, 44-522, 44-523, 44-7,101, 44-2132 to
44-2134, 44-3606, 44-4809, 44-4812, 44-4817, or 44-5266, the Privacy of
Insurance Consumer Information Act, or the Unfair Discrimination Against
Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act.
-3-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Section 44-1527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1527 The director may examine and investigate the affairs of every
insurer or health insurance lead generator doing business in this state in
order to determine whether such insurer or health insurance lead generator has
been, or is, engaged in an any unfair trade practice as defined in section
44-1524. A health insurance lead generator and an An insurer other than an
agent, broker, or insurance consultant shall reimburse the department for the
expense of examination in the same manner as provided for examination of
insurance companies in the Insurers Examination Act. In the case of a
depository institution, the director may examine and investigate the insurance
activities of a depository institution in order to determine whether the
depository institution has been, or is, engaged in an any unfair trade practice
defined in section 44-1524. The director shall notify the appropriate state or
federal banking agency of the director's intent to examine and investigate a
depository institution and advise the appropriate state or federal banking
agency of the suspected violation violations of state law prior to commencing
the examination and investigation.
Sec. 5. Section 44-1528, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1528 (1) Whenever the director has reason to believe that an any
insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person has engaged, or is
engaging, in this state in any unfair trade practice whether or not defined in
the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act and that a proceeding by him or her in
respect thereto would be to the interest of the public, the director he or she
shall issue and serve upon such insurer, health insurance lead generator, or
person a statement of the charges in that respect and a notice of a hearing
thereon to be held at a time and place stated fixed in the notice, which shall
be given not be less than ten days after the date of the service thereof.
(2) At the time and place fixed for such hearing, such insurer, health
insurance lead generator, or person shall have an opportunity to be heard and
to show cause why an order should not be made by the director requiring such
insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person to cease and desist from
the acts or practices so complained of. Upon good cause shown, the director
shall permit any person to intervene, appear, and be heard at such hearing by
counsel or in person.
(3) Nothing contained in the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act shall
require the observance at a any such hearing of formal rules of pleading or
evidence.
(4) The director, upon such hearing, may administer oaths, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, receive oral and documentary evidence, subpoena
witnesses, compel their attendance, and require the production of books,
papers, records, correspondence, or other documents which the director he or
she deems relevant to the inquiry. The director may, and upon the request of
any interested party shall, cause to be made a stenographic record of all the
evidence and all the proceedings had at such hearing. If no stenographic record
is made and if a judicial review is sought, the director shall prepare a
statement of the evidence and proceeding for use on review. In case of a
refusal of a any person to comply with a any subpoena issued under this section
or to testify with respect to any matter concerning which the person he or she
may be lawfully interrogated, the district court of Lancaster County or the
county where such party resides, on application of the director, may require
such person to comply with the such subpoena and to testify, and a any failure
to obey any such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt
thereof.
(5) Statements of charges, notices, orders, and other processes of the
director under the act may be served by a person anyone duly authorized by the
director, either in the manner provided by law for service of process in civil
actions or by mailing a copy thereof to the person affected by such statement,
notice, order, or other process at the person's his, her, or its residence or
principal office or place of business by either certified or registered mail,
return receipt requested. The verified return by the person so serving such
statement, notice, order, or other process, setting forth the manner of such
service, shall be proof of the same, and the return receipt for such statement,
notice, order, or other process, registered and mailed, shall be proof of the
service of the same.
Sec. 6. Section 44-1529, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1529 If, after the hearing, the director finds that the insurer, health
insurance lead generator, or person charged has engaged in an unfair trade
practice, the director he or she shall reduce the his or her findings to
writing and shall issue and cause to be served upon the insurer, health
insurance lead generator, or person charged with the violation a copy of such
findings and an order requiring such insurer, health insurance lead generator,
or person to cease and desist from engaging in the act or practice and the
director he or she may order any one or more of the following:
(1) Payment of a monetary penalty of not more than one thousand dollars
for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of thirty thousand
dollars, unless the violation was committed flagrantly in conscious disregard
of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, in which case the penalty shall be
not more than fifteen thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an
aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and
(2) Suspension or revocation of the insurer's license or certificate of
-4-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
authority if the insurer knew or reasonably should have known that the insurer
he, she, or it was in violation of the act.
Sec. 7. Section 44-1530, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1530 (1) Any insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person
subject to an order of the director under section 44-1529 or 44-1532 may appeal
the order. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.
(2) An order issued by the director under section 44-1529 shall become
final:
(a) Upon the expiration of the time allowed for filing a petition for
review if no such petition has been duly filed, except that the director may
thereafter modify or set aside the his or her order; or
(b) Upon the final decision of the court if the court directs that the
order of the director be affirmed or the petition for review dismissed.
(3) No order of the director under the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices
Act or order of a court to enforce such order shall in any way relieve or
absolve a any person affected by such order from any liability under any other
laws of this state.
Sec. 8. Section 44-1532, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1532 Any insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person violating
who violates a cease and desist order of the director under section 44-1529 may
after notice and hearing and upon order of the director be subject to:
(1) A monetary penalty of not more than thirty thousand dollars for each
violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars; and
(2) Suspension or revocation of the insurer's license or certificate of
authority.
Sec. 9. Section 44-2403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-2403 As used in the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty
Association Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Account means shall mean any one of the three accounts created by
section 44-2404;
(2) Director means shall mean the Director of Insurance or his or her duly
authorized representative;
(3) Association means shall mean the Nebraska Property and Liability
Insurance Guaranty Association created by section 44-2404;
(4)(a) Covered claim means shall mean an unpaid claim as provided for in
the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act and
which arises out of, and is within the coverage of, an insurance policy to
which the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act
applies issued by a member insurer that becomes insolvent after May 26, 1971,
and (i) the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at the time of the
insured event or (ii) the property from which the claim arises is permanently
located in this state. For entities other than an individual, the residence of
a claimant, insured, or policyholder is the state in which the principal place
of business is located at the time of the insured event. Covered claim includes
shall also include the policyholder's unearned premiums paid by the
policyholder on an insurance policy to which the act applies issued by a member
insurer that becomes insolvent on or after July 9, 1988. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to supersede, abrogate, or limit the common-law
ownership of accounts receivable for earned premium, unearned premium, or
unearned commission;
(b) Covered claim includes claim obligations that arise through the
issuance of an insurance policy by a member insurer, which are later allocated,
transferred, merged into, novated, assumed by, or otherwise made the sole
responsibility of a member or nonmember insurer, if: (i) The original member
insurer has no remaining obligations on the policy after the transfer; (ii) a
final order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency is entered against the
insurer that assumes the member's coverage obligations by a court of competent
jurisdiction in the insurer's state of domicile; (iii) the claim would have
been a covered claim, as defined in subdivision (4)(a) of this section, if the
claim had remained the responsibility of the original member insurer and the
order of liquidation had been entered against the original member insurer, with
the same claim submission date and liquidation date; and (iv) in cases where
the member's coverage obligations are assumed by a nonmember insurer, the
transaction receives prior regulatory or judicial approval;
(c) (b) Covered claim does shall not include any amount due any reinsurer,
insurer, liquidator, insurance pool, state or federal government program, or
underwriting association, as a subrogation or assignment recovery recoveries or
otherwise, a self-insured portion of the claim, a claim for any premium
calculated on a retrospective basis, a premium any premiums subject to
adjustment after the date of liquidation, or any amount due to an attorney or
adjuster as a fee fees for services rendered to the insolvent insurer. Covered
claim shall also does not include any amount as punitive or exemplary damages
or any amount claimed for incurred but not reported damages. Covered claim
shall also does not include any claim filed with the guaranty fund after the
earlier of twenty-five months after the date of the order of liquidation or the
final date set by the court for the filing of claims against the liquidator or
receiver. Nothing in this This subdivision (4)(b) shall not prevent a person
from presenting the excluded claim to the insolvent insurer or its liquidator,
-5-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
but the claim shall not be asserted against any other person, including the
person to whom benefits were paid or the insured of the insolvent insurer,
except to the extent that the claim is outside the coverage or is in excess of
the limits of the policy issued by the insolvent insurer;
(5) Insolvent insurer means shall mean a member insurer licensed to
transact the business of insurance in this state, either at the time the policy
was issued or when the insured event occurred, and against whom a final order
of liquidation, with a finding of insolvency, has been entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction in the company's state of domicile after September 2,
1977;
(6) Member insurer means a shall mean any person licensed to write any
kind of insurance to which the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance
Guaranty Association Act applies pursuant to by the provisions of section
44-2402, including the exchange of reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, that
is licensed to transact insurance in this state, except assessment associations
operating under Chapter 44, article 8, and also excepting unincorporated
mutuals;
(7) Net direct written premiums means shall mean direct gross premiums
written in this state on insurance policies to which the Nebraska Property and
Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act applies, less return premiums
thereon and dividends paid or credited to policyholders on such direct
business. Net direct written premiums does shall not include premiums on
contracts between insurers or reinsurers;
(8) Person means shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, association, voluntary organization, or reciprocal
insurance exchange; and
(9) Insurance means shall mean those contracts defined in section 44-102;
and .
(10) Cybersecurity insurance means first-party and third-party coverage in
a policy or endorsement, written on a direct, admitted basis for losses and
loss mitigation arising out of, or relating to, data privacy breaches,
unauthorized information network security intrusions, computer viruses,
ransomware, cyber extortion, identity theft, and similar exposures.
Sec. 10. Section 44-2405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-2405 (1) The board of directors of the association shall consist of
seven member insurers persons serving terms as established in the plan of
operation. The members of the board shall be selected by member insurers
subject to the approval of the director. At least four members of the board
shall represent domestic insurers. Vacancies on the board shall be filled for
the remaining period of the term in the same manner as initial appointments. If
no members are selected within sixty days after May 26, 1971, the director may
appoint the initial members of the board of directors.
(2) Subject to the limitations in subsection (1) of this section, the
director shall, in approving selections to the board, consider among other
things whether all member insurers are fairly represented.
(3) Members of the board may be reimbursed from the assets of the
association for expenses incurred by them as members of the board of directors
as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.
Sec. 11. Section 44-2406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-2406 (1) The association shall be obligated only to the extent of the
covered claims existing prior to the date a member insurer becomes an insolvent
insurer or arising within thirty days after it has been determined that the
insurer is an insolvent insurer, before the policy expiration date, if less
than thirty days after such determination, or before the insured replaces the
policy or on request effects cancellation, if the insured he or she does so
within thirty days of such dates, but such obligation shall include only the
amount of each covered claim that does not exceed three hundred thousand
dollars, except that the association shall pay the amount required by law on
any covered claim arising out of a workers' compensation policy. In no event
shall the association be obligated to a policyholder or claimant in an amount
in excess of the face amount of the policy from which the claim arises. The
association shall be obligated on covered claims, including those under a
workers' compensation policy, for unearned premiums only for the amount of each
covered claim that does not exceed ten thousand dollars per policy. The
association shall not be obligated to pay an amount in excess of three hundred
thousand dollars for all first-party and third-party claims under a policy or
endorsement providing, or that is found to provide, cybersecurity insurance
coverage and arising out of, or related to, a single insured event, without
regard to the number of claims made or the number of claimants.
(2) The director shall transmit to the association all covered claims
timely filed with him or her pursuant to the Nebraska Insurers Supervision,
Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act. The association shall thereupon be
considered to have been designated the director's representative pursuant to
the act, and it shall proceed to investigate, hear, settle, and determine such
claims unless the claimant shall, within thirty days from the date the claim is
filed with the director, file with the director a written demand that the claim
be processed in the liquidation proceedings as a claim not covered by the
Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act. In regard
to those claims transmitted to the association by the director, the association
and claimants shall have all of the rights and obligations and be subject to
the same limitations and procedures as are specified in the Nebraska Insurers
-6-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act for the determination of
claims.
(3) In the case of claims arising from bodily injury, sickness, or
disease, including death resulting therefrom, the amount of any such award
shall not exceed the claimant's reasonable expenses incurred for necessary
medical, surgical, X-ray, and dental services, including prosthetic devices and
necessary ambulance, hospital, professional nursing, and funeral services, and
any amounts actually lost by reason of claimant's inability to work and earn
wages or salary or their equivalent, but not other income, that would otherwise
have been earned in the normal course of such injured claimant's employment.
Such award may also include payments in fact made to others who are , not
members of claimant's household, which were reasonably incurred to obtain from
such other persons ordinary and necessary services for the production of income
in lieu of those services the claimant would have performed for himself or
herself had the claimant he or she not been injured. The amount of any such
award under this subsection shall be reduced by the amount the claimant is
entitled to receive as the beneficiary under any health, accident, or
disability insurance, under any salary or wage continuation program under which
the claimant he or she is entitled to benefits, or from the claimant's his or
her employer in the form of workers' compensation benefits, or any other such
benefits to which the claimant is legally entitled, and any claimant who
intentionally fails to correctly disclose a right his or her rights to any such
benefits shall forfeit all rights which the claimant he or she may have by the
provisions of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty
Association Act.
(4) A third party having a covered claim against any insured of an
insolvent insurer may file such claim with the director pursuant to the
Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, and the
association shall process such claim in the manner specified in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section. The filing of such claim shall constitute an
unconditional general release of all liability of such insured in connection
with the claim unless the association thereafter denies the claim for the
reason that the insurance policy issued by the insolvent insurer does not
afford coverage or unless the claimant, within thirty days from the date of
filing a his or her claim with the director, files with the director a written
demand that the claim be processed in the liquidation proceedings as a claim
not covered by the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty
Association Act.
Sec. 12. Section 44-2407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-2407 (1) The association shall:
(a) Allocate claims paid and expenses incurred among the three accounts
separately and assess member insurers separately for each account in the
amounts necessary to pay (i) the obligations of the association under section
44-2406, (ii) the expenses of handling covered claims, (iii) the cost of
examinations under sections 44-2412 and 44-2413, and (iv) other expenses
authorized by the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty
Association Act. The assessments of each member insurer shall be in the
proportion that the net direct written premiums of such member insurer, on the
basis of the insurance in the account involved, bears to the net direct written
premiums of all member insurers for the same period and in the same account for
the calendar year preceding the date of the assessment. The association may
make an assessment for the purpose of meeting administrative costs and other
general expenses not related to a particular impaired insurer, not to exceed
fifty dollars per member insurer in any one year. Each member insurer shall be
notified of the assessment not later than thirty days before it is due. Except
for such administrative assessment, no member insurer may be assessed in any
year, on any account, an amount greater than one percent of that member
insurer's net direct written premiums for the preceding calendar year on the
kinds of insurance in the account. The association may defer, in whole or in
part, the assessment of any member insurer if the assessment would cause the
member insurer's financial statement to reflect amounts of capital or surplus
less than the minimum required for a certificate of authority by any
jurisdiction in which the member insurer is authorized to transact business as
an insurer. Deferred assessments shall be paid when such payment will not
reduce capital or surplus below such required minimum amounts. Such deferred
assessments, when paid, shall be refunded to those member insurers that
received larger assessments by virtue of such deferment or, in the discretion
of any such insurer, credited against future assessments. No member insurer may
pay a dividend to shareholders or policyholders while such insurer has an
unpaid deferred assessment;
(b) Handle claims through its employees or through one or more insurers or
other persons designated by the association as a servicing facility, except
that the designation of a servicing facility shall be subject to the approval
of the director and such designation may be declined by a member insurer;
(c) Reimburse any servicing facility for obligations of the association
paid by the facility and for expenses incurred by the facility while handling
claims on behalf of the association and such other expenses of the association
as are authorized by the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty
Association Act;
(d) Issue to each insurer paying an assessment under this section, a
certificate of contribution in appropriate form and terms as prescribed by the
director for the amount so paid. All outstanding certificates shall be of equal
-7-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
dignity and priority without reference to amounts or dates of issue. The
insurer may offset against its premium and related retaliatory tax liability to
this state, pursuant to sections 44-150 and 77-908, accrued with respect to
business transacted in such year, an amount equal to twenty percent of the
original face amount of the certificate of contribution, beginning with the
first calendar year after the year of issuance through the fifth calendar year
after the year of issuance. If the association recovers any sum representing
amounts previously written off by member insurers and offset against premium
and related retaliatory taxes imposed by sections 44-150 and 77-908, such
recovered sum shall be paid by the association to the director who shall handle
such funds in the same manner as provided in Chapter 77, article 9;
(e) Be deemed the insolvent insurer to the extent of the association's
obligation for covered claims and to such extent shall have all rights, duties,
and obligations of the insolvent insurer, subject to the limitations provided
in the act, as if the insurer had not become insolvent, with the exception that
the liquidator shall retain the sole right to recover any reinsurance proceeds.
The association's rights under this section include, but are not limited to,
the right to pursue and retain salvage and subrogation recoveries on paid
covered claim obligations to the extent paid by the guaranty fund; and
(f) Have access to impaired or insolvent insurer records. The
rehabilitator or liquidator of an impaired or insolvent insurer shall permit
access by the association or its authorized representatives, and by any similar
organization in another state or its authorized representatives, to the
impaired or insolvent insurer's records which are necessary for the association
or such similar organization in carrying out its functions with regard to
covered claims. In addition, the rehabilitator or liquidator shall provide the
association or its representative or such similar organization with copies of
such records upon the request and at the expense of the association or similar
organization. In providing the information set forth in this subdivision, the
association or its authorized representatives and the rehabilitator or
liquidator of an impaired or insolvent insurer shall execute such agreements as
are necessary to preserve the confidentiality of the information provided; and
(g) Have the right to review and contest settlements, releases,
compromises, waivers, and judgments to which the insolvent insurer or its
insureds were parties prior to the entry of the order of liquidation. In an
action to enforce settlements, releases, and judgments to which the insolvent
insurer or its insureds were parties prior to the entry of the order of
liquidation, the association shall have the right to assert the following
defenses described in subsections (2) through (5) of this section, in addition
to the defenses available to the insurer.
(2) The association is not bound by a settlement, release, compromise, or
waiver executed by an insured or the insurer, or any judgment entered against
an insured or the insurer by consent or through failure to exhaust all appeals,
if the settlement, release, compromise, waiver, or judgment was (a) executed,
or entered into, within one hundred twenty days prior to the entry of an order
of liquidation, and the insured or the insurer did not use reasonable care when
it entered into the settlement, release, compromise, waiver, or judgment, or
did not pursue all reasonable appeals of an adverse judgment or (b) executed by
or taken against an insured or the insurer based on default, fraud, collusion,
or the insurer's failure to defend.
(3) If a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the association is not
bound by a settlement, release, compromise, waiver, or judgment for the reason
described in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of this section, the settlement,
release, compromise, waiver, or judgment shall be set aside, and the
association shall be permitted to defend any covered claim on the merits. The
settlement, release, compromise, waiver, or judgment shall not be considered as
evidence of liability or damages in connection with any claim brought against
the association or any other party.
(4) The association shall have the right to assert any statutory defenses
or rights of offset against any settlement, release, compromise, or waiver
executed by an insured or the insurer, or any judgment taken against the
insured or the insurer.
(5) As to any covered claims arising from a judgment under any decision,
verdict, or finding based on default of the insolvent insurer or its failure to
defend, the association, either on its own behalf or on behalf of the insured,
may apply to have the judgment, order, decision, verdict, or finding set aside
by the same court or administrator that entered the judgment, order, decision,
verdict, or finding and shall be permitted to defend the claim on the merits.
(6) (2) The association may:
(a) Appear in, defend, and appeal any action;
(b) Employ or retain such persons as are necessary to handle claims,
provide covered policy benefits and services, and appoint and direct other
service providers for covered services and perform other duties of the
association;
(c) Borrow funds necessary to effect the purposes of the Nebraska Property
and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act in accord with the plan of
operation;
(d) Sue or be sued, and such power to sue shall include the power and
right to intervene as a party before any court that has jurisdiction over an
insolvent insurer as defined by such act;
(e) Negotiate and become a party to such contracts as are necessary to
carry out the purpose of such act;
(f) Perform such other acts as are necessary or proper to effectuate the
-8-

LB326 LB326
2025 2025
purpose of such act; and
(g) Bring any action against any third-party administrator, agent,
attorney, or other representative of the insolvent insurer to obtain custody
and control of all files, records, and electronic data related to an insolvent
insurer that is appropriate or necessary for the association, or a similar
organization in another state, to carry out duties under such act.
Sec. 13. Section 44-2411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-2411 (1) Any person having a claim against any insurer under any
provisions of any insurance policy, which claim is also a covered claim against
an insolvent insurer under the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance
Guaranty Association Act, shall be required to exhaust all rights under such
policy before the association is obligated to pay the covered claim, whether
the claim is a first-party or third-party claim, including, but not limited to,
accident and health insurance, workers' compensation, and all other coverages
except policies of an insolvent insurer. Any person having a claim against any
state or federal government program, which claim would also give rise to a
covered claim, shall be required to exhaust all rights under such government
program before the association is obligated to pay the covered claim under such
act. Any amount payable on a covered claim by the provisions of such act shall
be reduced by the amount of the such recovery under any other insurance policy
or state or federal government program.
(2) Any person having a claim which may be recovered under more than one
insurance guaranty association, or its equivalent, shall seek recovery first
from the association of the place of residence of the insured, except that if
it is a first-party claim for damage to property with a permanent location,
from the association of the location of the property, and if it is a workers'
compensation claim, from the association of the residence of the claimant. Any
recovery pursuant to the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty
Association Act shall be reduced by the amount of the recovery from any other
insurance guaranty association or its equivalent.
Sec. 14. Section 44-6135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-6135 A mutual insurance holding company shall file with the director,
by March 1 of each year, an annual statement consisting of an income statement,
balance sheet, and cash flows prepared in accordance with generally accepted
accounting practices or statutory accounting principles and a confidential
statement disclosing any intention to pledge, borrow against, alienate,
hypothecate, or in any way encumber the assets of the mutual insurance holding
company. A mutual insurance holding company shall also have an annual audit by
an independent certified public accountant in a form approved by the director
and shall file such audit on or before June 1 of each year for the year ending
December 31 immediately preceding.
Sec. 15. Original sections 44-1523, 44-1524, 44-1525, 44-1527, 44-1528,
44-1529, 44-1530, 44-1532, 44-2403, 44-2405, 44-2406, 44-2407, 44-2411, and
44-6135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 16. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 44-5301,
44-5302, 44-5303, 44-5304, 44-5305, 44-5306, 44-5307, 44-5308, 44-5309,
44-5310, 44-5311, 44-6701, and 44-6702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-9-